Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 44 Insurance Holding Company System Regulatory Act
§ 26-44-105.
Transactions within a holding company system.

Transactions within an insurance holding company system to which an insurer subject to registration is a party shall be subject to the following standards:

The terms shall be fair and reasonable;

Charges or fees for services performed shall be reasonable;

Expenses incurred and payment received shall be allocated to the insurer in conformity with customary insurance accounting practices consistently applied;

The books, accounts and records of each party to all the transactions shall be so maintained as to clearly and accurately disclose the nature and details of the transactions including any accounting information necessary to support the reasonableness of the charges or fees to the respective parties;

The insurer’s surplus as regards policy holders following any dividends or distributions to shareholder affiliates shall be reasonable in relation to the insurer’s outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs as set forth in W.S.

26-44-108

; and

Agreements for cost sharing services and management shall include provisions as required by regulation issued by the commissioner.

The following transactions involving a domestic insurer and any person in its insurance holding company system, including amendments or modifications of affiliate agreements previously filed pursuant to this section, which are subject to any materiality standards contained in subsection (b) of this section, shall not be entered into unless the insurer has notified the commissioner in writing of its intention to enter into the transaction at least thirty (30) days prior to the transaction or a shorter period as the commissioner may permit and the commissioner has not disapproved it within that period. The notice for amendments or modifications shall include the reasons for the change and the financial impact on the domestic insurer. Informal notice shall be reported, within thirty (30) days after a termination of a previously filed agreement, to the commissioner for determination of the type of filing required, if any. In assessing transactions under this subsection, the commissioner shall consider whether the transactions comply with subsection (a) of this section and whether they may adversely affect the interests of policyholders. The transactions to be considered are:

Sales, purchases, exchanges, loans or extensions of credit, guarantees or investments if on December 31 of the year immediately preceding the transactions are equal to or exceed:

With respect to nonlife insurers, the lesser of three percent (3%) of the insurer’s admitted assets or twenty-five percent (25%) of surplus as regards policyholders;

With respect to life insurers, three percent (3%) of the insurer’s admitted assets.

Loans or extensions of credit to any person who is not an affiliate, where the insurer makes the loans or extensions of credit with the agreement or understanding that the proceeds of the transactions, in whole or in substantial part, are to be used to make loans or extensions of credit to purchase assets of, or to make investments in, any affiliate of the insurer making the loans or extensions of credit if on December 31 of the year immediately preceding the transactions are equal to or exceed:

With respect to nonlife insurers, the lesser of three percent (3%) of the insurer’s admitted assets or twenty-five percent (25%) of surplus as regards policyholders;

With respect to life insurers, three percent (3%) of the insurer’s admitted assets.

Reinsurance agreements or modifications thereto, including all reinsurance pooling agreements, agreements in which the reinsurance premium or a change in the insurer’s liabilities, or the projected reinsurance premium or a change in the insurer’s liabilities in any of the next three (3) years, equals or exceeds five percent (5%) of the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders, as of December 31 of the year immediately preceding, including those agreements which may require as consideration the transfer of assets from an insurer to a nonaffiliate, if an agreement or understanding exists between the insurer and nonaffiliate that any portion of the assets will be transferred to one (1) or more affiliates of the insurer;

All management agreements, service contracts, tax allocation agreements and all cost-sharing arrangements; and

Any material transactions, specified by regulation, which the commissioner determines may adversely affect the interests of the insurer’s policyholders.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to authorize or permit any transaction which, in the case of an insurer not a member of the same insurance holding company system, would be otherwise contrary to law.

A domestic insurer shall not enter into transactions which are part of a plan or series of like transactions with persons within the insurance holding company system if the purpose of those separate transactions is to avoid the notification requirement set forth in subsection (b) of this section and thus the review that would otherwise occur. If the commissioner determines that separate transactions were entered into over any twelve (12) month period for that purpose, the commissioner may exercise his authority under W.S.

26-44-113

.

The commissioner shall be notified within thirty (30) days of any investment of the domestic insurer in any one (1) corporation if the total investment in the corporation by the insurance holding company system exceeds ten percent (10%) of the corporation’s voting securities.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-105; Laws 2004, ch. 14, § 2; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in the introductory paragraph of (b), substituted “thirty (30) days” for “twenty (20) days.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “an insurance” for “a” preceding “holding company” in (a); deleted “and” following “parties;” in (a)(iv); added “as regards policy holders” following “insurer’s surplus”; and substituted “; and” for “.” at the end of (v); added (vi); added “insurance” preceding “holding company”; added “, including amendments or modifications of affiliate agreements previously filed pursuant to this section, which are subject to any materiality standards contained in subsection (b) of this section,” following “system”; added “The notice for amendments or modifications shall include the reasons for the change and the financial impact on the domestic insurer. Informal notice shall be reported, within thirty (30) days after a termination of a previously filed agreement, to the commissioner for determination of the type of filing required, if any.” following “within that period.” in (b); added “as regards policyholders” following “of surplus” in (b)(ii)(A); added “there to, including all reinsurance pooling agreements, agreements” following “modifications”; added “, or the projected reinsurance premium or a change in the insurer’s liabilities in any of the next three (3) years,” following “insurer’s liabilities”; added “as regards policyholders” following “insurer’s surplus” in (b)(iii); added “, tax allocation agreements” following “service contracts” in (b)(iv); added “insurance” preceding “holding company” in (c); and added “insurance” preceding “holding company”; added “If the commissioner determines that separate transactions were entered into over any twelve (12) month period for that purpose, the commissioner may exercise his authority under W.S.

26-44-113

.” following “otherwise occur.” in (d).

§ 26-44-106.
Dividends and other distributions.

A domestic insurer shall not pay any extraordinary dividend or make any other extraordinary distribution to its shareholders until thirty (30) days after the commissioner has received notice of the declaration of dividend and has not disapproved payment, or the commissioner has approved the payment whichever is shorter.

For purposes of this section, an extraordinary dividend or distribution includes any dividend or distribution of cash or other property, whose fair market value together with that of other dividends or distributions made within the preceding twelve (12) months exceeds the lesser of:

Ten percent (10%) of the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders as of December 31 of the year immediately preceding; or

The net gain from operations of the insurer, if the insurer is a life insurer, or the net income, if the insurer is not a life insurer, not including realized capital gains, for the twelve (12) month period ending December 31 of the year immediately preceding, nor pro rata distributions of the insurer’s own securities.

In determining whether a dividend or distribution is extraordinary, an insurer other than a life insurer may carry forward net income from the previous two (2) calendar years that has not already been paid out as dividends. This carry-forward shall be computed by taking the net income from the second and third preceding calendar years, not including realized capital gains, less dividends paid in the second and immediate preceding calendar years.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an insurer may declare an extraordinary dividend or distribution which is conditional upon the commissioner’s approval. This declaration shall confer no rights upon shareholders until the commissioner has approved the payment or the commissioner has not disapproved the payment within thirty (30) days, whichever is shorter.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-106; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “as regards policyholders” following “insurer’s surplus” in (b)(i); and added “, nor pro rata distributions of the insurer’s own securities” following “immediately preceding” in (b)(ii).

§ 26-44-107.
Management of domestic insurers subject to registration.

The officers and directors of the insurer are not relieved of any obligation or liability to which they would otherwise be subject by law because the control of the domestic insurer lies with any other person. The insurer shall be managed to assure its separate operating identity consistent with this title.

Nothing in this act shall preclude a domestic insurer from having or sharing a common management or cooperative or joint use of personnel, property or services with one (1) or more other persons under arrangements meeting the standards of W.S. 26-44-105(a).

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-107.

§ 26-44-108.
Adequacy of surplus.

For purposes of this act, in determining whether an insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders is reasonable in relation to the insurer’s outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs, the following factors, among others, shall be considered:

The size of the insurer as measured by its assets, capital and surplus, reserves, premium writings, insurance in force and other appropriate criteria;

The extent to which the insurer’s business is diversified among the several lines of insurance;

The number and size of risks insured in each line of business;

The extent of the geographical dispersion of the insurer’s insured risks;

The nature and extent of the insurer’s reinsurance program;

The quality, diversification and liquidity of the insurer’s investment portfolio;

The recent past and projected future trend in the size of the insurer’s investment portfolio;

The surplus as regards policyholders maintained by other comparable insurers;

The adequacy of the insurer’s reserves; and

The quality and liquidity of investments in affiliates.

The commissioner may treat any investment as a disallowed asset for purposes of determining the adequacy of surplus as regards policyholders whenever he deems that treatment necessary.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-108; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “as regards policyholders” following “insurer's surplus” in (a); added “as regards policyholders” following “The surplus” in (a)(viii); and added “as regards policyholders” following “of surplus” in (b).

§ 26-44-109.
Examination.

The commissioner may examine any insurer registered under W.S.

26-44-104

or any affiliate of the insurer in accordance with this section and the provisions of W.S.

26-2-116

through

26-2-124

to ascertain the financial condition of the insurer, including the enterprise risk to the insurer by the ultimate controlling party, or by any entity or combination of entities within the insurance holding company system, or by the insurance holding company system on a consolidated basis. The commissioner may retain at the insurer’s expense any attorneys, actuaries, accountants and other experts not otherwise a part of the commissioner’s staff reasonably necessary to conduct the examination. Any person so retained shall be under the direction and control of the commissioner and shall act in a purely advisory capacity.

To determine compliance with this chapter, the commissioner may order any insurer registered under W.S.

26-44-104

to produce information not in the possession of the insurer if the insurer can obtain access to this information pursuant to contractual relationships, statutory obligations or other method. In the event the insurer cannot obtain the information requested by the commissioner, the insurer shall provide the commissioner a detailed explanation of the reason that the insurer cannot obtain the information and the identity of the holder of the information. Whenever it appears to the commissioner that the detailed explanation is without merit, the commissioner may, after notice and hearing, suspend or revoke the insurer’s license or certificate.

In the event the insurer fails to comply with an order, the commissioner shall have the power to examine the affiliates to obtain the information. The commissioner shall also have the power to issue subpoenas, to administer oaths and to examine under oath any person for purposes of determining compliance with this section. Upon the failure or refusal of any person to obey a subpoena, the commissioner may petition a court of competent jurisdiction, and upon proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-109; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the existing
paragraph and redesignated it as (a); and added (b) and (c).

§ 26-44-110.
Confidential treatment.

All information, documents and copies of the documents and information obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in the course of an examination made pursuant to W.S.

26-44-109

and all information reported pursuant to W.S. 26-44-103(b)(xii) and (xiii),

26-44-104

through

26-44-108

and

26-44-119

shall be confidential, shall not be subject to subpoena and shall not be disclosed by the commissioner, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or any person, except as authorized by and in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 26-2-113(d), without the prior written consent of the insurer to which the information pertains. The commissioner, after giving the insurer and its affiliates notice and opportunity to be heard, may determine that the interest of policyholders, shareholders or the public will be served by the publication of the information, in which event he may publish all or any part of the information as he deems appropriate.

Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents, materials or other information while acting under the authority of the commissioner or with whom the documents, materials or other information are shared pursuant to this act shall be permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential documents, materials or information subject to subsection (a) of this section.

Notwithstanding W.S.

26-2-113

, the commissioner shall only share confidential and privileged documents, material or information reported pursuant to W.S. 26-44-104(n) with commissioners of states having statutes or regulations substantially similar to Wyoming insurance statutes and who have agreed in writing not to disclose the information.

In addition to any other authorities provided by law, the commissioner shall enter into written agreements with the NAIC governing sharing and use of information provided pursuant to this act consistent with this subsection which shall:

Specify procedures and protocols regarding the confidentiality and security of information shared with the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries pursuant to this act, including procedures and protocols for sharing by the NAIC with other state, federal or international regulators;

Specify that ownership of information shared with the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries pursuant to this act remains with the commissioner and the NAIC’s use of the information is subject to the direction of the commissioner;

Require prompt notice to be given to an insurer whose confidential information in the possession of the NAIC pursuant to this act is subject to a request or subpoena to the NAIC for disclosure or production; and

Require the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries to consent to intervention by an insurer in any judicial or administrative action in which the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries may be required to disclose confidential information about the insurer shared with the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries pursuant to this chapter.

The sharing of information by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute a delegation of regulatory authority or rulemaking and the commissioner is solely responsible for the administration, execution and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials or information shall occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this chapter or as a result of sharing as authorized under this chapter.

Documents, materials or other information in the possession or control of the NAIC pursuant to this chapter shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be a public record under W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

, shall not be subject to subpoena and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-110; Laws 2001, ch. 9, § 1; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, designated existing paragraph as (a); added “26-44-103(b)(xii) and (xiii) and” following “to W.S.” in (a); and added (b) through (g).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
in (a), added a comma after "(xiii)" and added "and

26-44-119

" after "shall" in the first sentence.

§ 26-44-111.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner may promulgate reasonable rules and regulations and issue orders necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-111.

§ 26-44-112.
Injunctions; prohibitions against voting securities; sequestration of voting securities.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any insurer or any director, officer, employee or agent of the insurer has committed or is about to commit a violation of this act or of any rule, regulation or order issued by the commissioner pursuant to this act, the commissioner may apply to the district court for the county in which the principal office of the insurer is located or, if the insurer has no office in this state, then to the district court for Laramie county for an injunction.

No security which is the subject of any agreement or arrangement regarding acquisition, or which is acquired or to be acquired, in violation of this act or of any rule, regulation or order issued by the commissioner pursuant to this act may be voted at any shareholder’s meeting, or may be counted for quorum purposes, and any action of shareholders requiring the affirmative vote of a percentage of shares may be taken as though the securities were not issued and outstanding. No action taken at any meeting shall be invalidated by the voting of the securities, unless the action would materially affect control of the insurer or unless the Wyoming courts have so ordered. If an insurer or the commissioner has reason to believe that any security of the insurer has been or is about to be acquired in violation of this act or of any rule, regulation or order issued by the commissioner pursuant to this act, the insurer or the commissioner may apply to the court for the county in which the insurer has its principle place of business to enjoin any action violating this act, to enjoin the voting of any security acquired in violation of this act, to void any vote of such a security already cast at any meeting of shareholders and for other equitable relief.

In any case where a person has acquired or is proposing to acquire any voting securities in violation of this act or any rule, regulation or order issued by the commissioner, the commissioner or insurer may request the district court to seize or sequester any voting securities of the insurer owned directly or indirectly by the person, and issue an order appropriate to carry out the purposes of this act. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for the purposes of this act the sites of the ownership of the securities of domestic insurers shall be deemed to be in Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-112.

§ 26-44-113.
Sanctions.

Any insurer failing, without just cause, to file any registration statement as required in this act shall be required, after notice and hearing, to pay a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each day’s delay, to be recovered by the commissioner. The penalty recovered shall be paid into the general fund. The commissioner may reduce the penalty if the insurer demonstrates to the commissioner that the imposition of the penalty would constitute a financial hardship to the insurer.

Any director or officer of an insurance holding company system who knowingly violates, participates in, or assents to, or who knowingly permits any of the officers or agents of the insurer to engage in transactions or make investments which violate this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any insurer subject to this act or any director, officer, employee or agent of the insurer has engaged in any transaction or entered into a contract which is subject to this act and which would not have been approved had approval been requested, the commissioner may order the insurer to cease and desist immediately any further activity under that transaction or contract. After notice and hearing the commissioner may also order the insurer to void any contracts and restore the status quo if the action is in the best interest of the policyholders, creditors or the public.

Any officer, director or employee of an insurance holding company system who willfully and knowingly subscribes to or makes or causes to be made any false statements or false reports or false filings with the intent to deceive the commissioner in the performance of his duties under this article is guilty of a felony and shall be fined not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00), imprisoned for not more than ten (10) years, or both.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has committed a violation of W.S.

26-44-103

which prevents the full understanding of the enterprise risk to the insurer by affiliates or by the insurance holding company system, the violation may serve as an independent basis for disapproving dividends or distributions and for placing the insurer under an order in accordance with chapter 28 of this title.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-113; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (e).

§ 26-44-114.
Receivership.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has committed a violation of this act which so impairs the financial condition of a domestic insurer as to threaten insolvency or make the further transaction of business by the person not in the best interest of the policyholders, creditors, shareholders or the public, then the commissioner may proceed as provided in chapter 28 of this title.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-114.

§ 26-44-115.
Recovery.

Subject to subsections (b), (c) and (d) of this section, if an order for liquidation or rehabilitation of a domestic insurer has been entered, the receiver appointed under the order shall have a right to recover on behalf of the insurer any distribution or payment made at any time during the one (1) year preceding the petition for liquidation, conservation or rehabilitation which is either:

From any parent corporation or holding company or person or affiliate who otherwise controlled the insurer, the amount of distributions other than distributions of shares of the same class of stock paid by the insurer on its capital stock; or

Any payment in the form of a bonus, termination settlement or extraordinary lump sum salary adjustment made by the insurer or its subsidiary to a director, officer or employee.

A distribution shall not be recoverable if the parent or affiliate shows that, when paid, the distribution was lawful and reasonable, and that the insurer did not know and could not reasonably have known that the distribution might adversely affect the ability of the insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations.

Any person who was a parent corporation or holding company or a person who otherwise controlled the insurer or affiliate at the time the distributions were paid shall be liable up to the amount of distributions or payments the person received under subsection (a) of this section. Any person who otherwise controlled the insurer at the time the distributions were declared shall be liable up to the amount of distributions he would have received if they had been paid immediately.

The maximum amount recoverable under this section shall be the amount needed in excess of all other available assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer to pay the contractual obligations of the impaired or insolvent insurer and to reimburse any guaranty funds.

To the extent that any person liable under subsection (c) of this section is insolvent or otherwise fails to pay claims due from it pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, its parent corporation or holding company or person who otherwise controlled it at the time the distribution was paid, shall be liable for any resulting deficiency in the amount recovered from the parent corporation or holding company or person who otherwise controlled it.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-115.

§ 26-44-116.
Revocation, suspension or nonrenewal of insurer's license.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has committed a violation of this act which makes the continued operation of an insurer contrary to the interests of policyholders or the public, the commissioner may, after giving notice and an opportunity for hearing, determine to suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the insurer’s license or authority to do business in Wyoming for any period he finds is required for the protection of policyholders or the public. The determination shall be accompanied by specific findings of fact and conclusions of law.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-116.

§ 26-44-117.
Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved or adversely affected in fact by any final decision, order, ruling, finding or other act of the insurance commissioner made pursuant to this chapter may obtain judicial review in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-39-117.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 26-44-118.
Supervisory colleges.

With respect to any insurer registered under W.S.

26-44-104

, and in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, the commissioner shall also have the power to participate in a supervisory college for any domestic insurer that is part of an insurance holding company system with international operations in order to determine compliance by the insurer with this chapter. The powers of the commissioner with respect to supervisory colleges include, but are not limited to, the following:

Initiating the establishment of a supervisory college;

Clarifying the membership and participation of other supervisors in the supervisory college;

Clarifying the functions of the supervisory college and the role of other regulators, including the establishment of a group-wide supervisor;

Coordinating the ongoing activities of the supervisory college, including planning meetings, supervisory activities, and processes for information sharing; and

Establishing a crisis management plan.

Each registered insurer subject to this section shall be liable for and shall pay the reasonable expenses of the commissioner’s participation in a supervisory college in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, including reasonable travel expenses. For purposes of this section, a supervisory college may be convened as either a temporary or permanent forum for communication and cooperation between the regulators charged with the supervision of the insurer or its affiliates, and the commissioner may establish a regular assessment to the insurer for the payment of these expenses.

In order to assess the business strategy, financial position, legal and regulatory position, risk exposure, risk management and governance processes, and as part of the examination of individual insurers in accordance with W.S.

26-44-109

, the commissioner may participate in a supervisory college with other regulators charged with supervision of the insurer or its affiliates, including other state, federal and international regulatory agencies. The commissioner may enter into agreements providing the basis for cooperation between the commissioner and the other regulatory agencies, and the activities of the supervisory college. Nothing in this section shall delegate to the supervisory college the authority of the commissioner to regulate or supervise the insurer or its affiliates within his jurisdiction.

History.

2013 ch. 57, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 57, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.